Hawaii statutes.
[§465D-8] Application for licensure.
The department shall issue a license under this chapter to an applicant for
behavior analyst if the applicant provides satisfactory evidence to the
department that the applicant meets the requirements for licensure contained in
this chapter and rules adopted by the director and if the applicant for
behavior analyst:

(1) Successfully passed the Board Certified Behavior
Analyst examination;

(2) Maintains active status with the Behavior Analyst
Certification Board as a board certified behavior analyst or board certified
behavior analyst-doctoral; and

(3) Pays all fees for licensure established by the
director. [L 2015, c 199, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next